Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-3543
Hospital district; area withdrawn; not subject to assessments after withdrawal.

An area withdrawn from a district shall not be subject to assessment or otherwise chargeable for any obligation of any nature or kind incurred after the withdrawal of the area from the district.

Laws 1959, c. 83, § 15, p. 379;

R.S.1943, (1987), § 23-343.34.